Utah statutes.
76-5-108.   Protective orders restraining abuse of another -- Violation.
(1)  Any person who is the respondent or defendant subject to a protective
order, child protective order, ex parte protective order, or ex parte child
protective order issued under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1, Cohabitant Abuse
Act, or Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996, Title 77, Chapter
36, Cohabitant Abuse Procedures Act, or a foreign protection order enforceable
under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 3, Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic
Violence Protection Orders Act, who intentionally or knowingly violates that
order after having been properly served, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor,
except as a greater penalty may be provided in Title 77, Chapter 36,
Cohabitant Abuse Procedures Act.
(2)  Violation of an order as described in Subsection (1) is a domestic
violence offense under Section 77-36-1 and subject to increased penalties in
accordance with Section 77-36-1.1.
